District of Columbia statutes.
16-2324

Vacation, termination of orders.

(a)

An order of the Division under this subchapter shall be set aside if —

(1)

it was obtained by fraud or mistake sufficient to set aside an order or judgment in a civil action;

(2)

the Division lacked jurisdiction; or

(3)

newly discovered evidence so requires.

(b)

Not less than 6 months after issuing an order pursuant to section 16-2323(h)(2), the Division may terminate an order under this subchapter on the grounds that the Youth Services Administration is not providing or cannot provide appropriate services or level of placement.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341
May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-272, § 104, 40 DCR 796
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-261, § 803, 52 DCR 1188

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2324.
1973 Ed., § 16-2324.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-261, in the section heading, substituted “Vacation” for “Modification”; designated the existing language of the section as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).